Washington statutes.
RCW 43.160.080

Public facilities construction loan revolving account.

There shall be a fund in the state treasury known as the public facilities construction loan revolving account, which shall consist of all moneys collected under this chapter and any moneys appropriated to it by law. Disbursements from the revolving account shall be on authorization of the board. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the public facilities construction loan revolving account shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW. During the 2013-2015 biennium, amounts in the public facilities construction loan revolving account may be used for the animal disease traceability project in section 3247, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., administered by the department of agriculture. During the 2013-2015 biennium, sums in the public facilities construction loan revolving account may be used for the clean energy partnership project in section 1038, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the public facilities construction loan revolving account may be used to continue and enhance the animal disease traceability project in section 3247, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., administered by the department of agriculture. During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the public facilities construction loan revolving account may be used for the clean energy partnership project in section 1038, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7034; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 6029; 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6011; 2008 c 327 s 11; 1998 c 321 s 30 (Referendum Bill No. 49, approved November 3, 1998); 1992 c 235 s 10; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 115; 1987 c 422 s 6; 1984 c 257 s 12; 1983 1st ex.s. c 60 s 6; 1982 1st ex.s. c 40 s 8.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 6029 and by 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7034, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 3: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [June 30, 2015]." [ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7045.]

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 43.155.050.

Effective date—2008 c 327 ss 1, 2, 4-11, 17: See note following RCW 43.160.010.

Purpose—Severability—1998 c 321: See notes following RCW 82.14.045.

Contingent effective dates—1998 c 321 ss 23-42: See note following RCW 35.58.410.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.